Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5271.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 70H the
following section:
Section 70I. (a) Any hospital, clinic, ambulatory surgery center or physician licensed
pursuant to chapter 112 that performs a colonoscopy shall, prior to the administration of sedation
or anesthesia, provide the patient with written and verbal notice of the patient’s right to decline
anesthesia or to request alternative methods of pain management, unless a physician has
determined, based on the patient's medical history or complexity of the procedure, that the
colonoscopy cannot be performed safely without sedation or anesthesia.
(b) Such notice shall be provided during the informed consent process and documented in
the patient’s medical record.
(c) Prior to the procedure, the patient shall also be provided with a good faith estimate of
the costs associated with the colonoscopy, both with and without the use of anesthesia or
of 2

alternative methods of pain management, including any facility, provider and professional fees
reasonably anticipated at the time of scheduling.
(d) The department, in consultation with the board of registration in medicine, shall
promulgate regulations to implement this section.
of 2